Missouri, session 2026, HB1698.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.775, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 160.775, to read as follows:
160.775. 1. [Every district shall adopt an antibullying policy by September 1, 2007]
This section shall be known and may be cited as "Sawyer's Law".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Act of school violence" or "violent behavior", the same meaning as in
section 160.261;
(2) "Bullying" [means], intimidation, unwanted aggressive behavior, or harassment
that is repetitive or is substantially likely to be repeated and causes a reasonable student to
fear for his or her physical safety or property; substantially interferes with the educational
performance, opportunities, or benefits of any student without exception; or substantially
disrupts the orderly operation of the school. Bullying may consist of physical actions,
including gestures, or oral, cyberbullying, electronic, or written communication, and any
threat of retaliation for reporting of such acts. Bullying of students is prohibited on school
property, at any school function, or on a school bus[.];
(3) "Crime", any of the crimes listed in section 160.261;
(4) "Cyberbullying" [means], bullying as defined in this subsection through the
transmission of a communication including, but not limited to, a message, text, sound, or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1698 2
image by means of an electronic device including, but not limited to, a telephone, wireless
telephone, or other wireless communication device, computer, or pager;
(5) "Zero-tolerance disciplinary policy", a policy or practice of discipline that
results in an automatic disciplinary consequence such as suspension or expulsion for any
student who commits one or more listed offenses even if administrators have some
discretion to modify the consequence on a case-by-case basis.
3. Each schooldistrict's and charter school'santibullying policy shall be founded on
the assumption that all students need a safe learning environment. Policies shall treat all
students equally and shall not contain specific lists of protected classes of students who are to
receive special treatment. Policies may include age-appropriate differences for schools based
on the grade levels at the school. Each such policy shall contain a statement of the
consequences of bullying.
4. Each schooldistrict's and charter school'santibullying policy shall be included in
the student handbook and shall require, at a minimum, the following components:
(1) A statement prohibiting bullying, defined no less inclusively than in subsection 2
of this section;
(2) A statement requiring school district or charter school employees to report any
instance of bullying of which the employee has firsthand knowledge. The policy shall require
a school district or charter school employee who witnesses an incident of bullying to report
the incident to the school district's or charter school's designated individual at the school
[within two school days of the] immediately upon the employee witnessing the incident;
(3) A statement relating to victims of bullying that the school district or charter
school prohibits, does not have, and will not adopt, in name or in practice, a zero-
tolerance disciplinary policy;
(4) A statement relating to pupils who engage in self-defense that the school
district or charter school administration, when determining disciplinary action for a
pupil who has committed an act of school violence or exhibited violent behavior, will
take into account if such act of school violence or violent behavior was committed in self-
defense as an immediate response to an act of school violence or violent behavior
committed against such pupil;
(5) A procedure for reporting an act of bullying. The policy shall also include a
statement requiring that the school district or charter school designate an individual at each
school building in the district and charter school to receive reports of incidents of bullying.
Such individual shall be a school district or charter school employee who is teacher level
staff or above;

HB 1698 3
[(4)] (6) A procedure for prompt investigation of reports of violations and complaints,
identifying one or more employees responsible for the investigation including, at a minimum,
the following requirements:
(a) Within two school days of a report of an incident of bullying being received, the
school principal, or his or her designee, shall initiate an investigation of the incident and
ensure that the report is reduced to writing;
(b) The school principal may appoint other school staff to assist with the
investigation; [and]
(c) The investigation shall be completed within ten school days from the date [of the
written report] the investigation is initiated under paragraph (a) of this subdivisionunless
good cause exists to extend the investigation; and
(d) A written report shall be prepared that contains the results of the
investigation and any response including, but not limited to, a description of any
interventions, initiatives, techniques, or discipline provided to all involved individuals of
the incident. The school district or charter school may develop a standardized form to
use for such written report;
[(5)] (7) A procedure for the response to any investigation that finds an act of
bullying occurred. The policy shall, at a minimum, require notification of the parents or
guardians of the bullied student and of the bullying student and, if such bullying meets
the elements of harassment in the second degree under section 565.091, referral to law
enforcement agencies or to the children's division rather than law enforcement if the
bullying student is under eleven years of age;
(8) A statement that prohibits reprisal or retaliation against any person who reports an
act of bullying and the consequence and appropriate remedial action for a person who
engages in reprisal or retaliation;
[(6)] (9) A statement of how the policy is to be publicized; and
[(7)] (10) A process for discussing the district's antibullying policy with students and
training school employees and volunteers who have [significant] contact with students in the
requirements of the policy, including, at a minimum, the following statements:
(a) The school district or charter school shall provide information and appropriate
training to the school district or charter school staff who have [significant] contact with
students regarding the policy including, but not limited to, training on the appropriate
interventions staff may take and the associated liability for action or inaction including,
but not limited to, failure to report incidents;
(b) The school district or charter school shall give annual notice of the policy to
students, parents or guardians, and staff;

HB 1698 4
(c) The school district or charter school shall provide education and information to
students regarding bullying, including information regarding the school district or charter
school policy prohibiting bullying, the harmful effects of bullying, and other applicable
initiatives to address bullying, including student peer-to-peer initiatives to provide
accountability and policy enforcement for those found to have engaged in bullying,
reprisal, or retaliation against any person who reports an act of bullying;
(d) The administration of the school district or charter schoolshall instruct its school
counselors, school social workers, licensed social workers, mental health professionals, and
school psychologists to educate students who are victims of bullying and students
committing acts of bullying on techniques for students to overcome bullying's negative
effects. Such techniques shall include, but not be limited to, cultivating the student's self-
worth and self-esteem; teaching the student to defend himself or herself assertively and
100 effectively; helping the student develop social skills; or encouraging the student to develop an
101 internal locus of control. The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to contradict
102 or limit any other provision of this section; and
103 (e) The administration of the school district or charter school shall implement
104 programs and other initiatives to address bullying, to respond to such conduct in a manner
105 that does not stigmatize the victim, and to make resources or referrals available to victims of
106 bullying and students committing acts of bullying.
107 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any school district or
108 charter school shall have jurisdiction to prohibit cyberbullying that originates on a school's
109 campus or at a district activity if the electronic communication was made using the school's
110 technological resources, if there is a sufficient nexus to the educational environment, or if the
111 electronic communication was made on the school's campus or at a school district or charter
112 school activity using the student's own personal technological resources. The school district
113 or charter school may discipline any student for such cyberbullying to the greatest extent
114 allowed by law.
115 6. Each school district and charter school shall review its antibullying policy and
116 revise it as needed. The school district's school board or charter school's governing board
117 shall receive input from school personnel, students, and administrators when reviewing and
118 revising the policy.
119 7. (1) The administration of each school district and charter school shall report
120 to the school board or governing board all acts of bullying, acts of school violence or
121 violent behavior, and crimes that occurred in between board meetings and the discipline
122 of any pupil who committed such acts. Such report shall be submitted monthly and
123 shall be formatted to clearly describe each such incident.

HB 1698 5
124 (2) The school board or governing board shall review such monthly report in a
125 closed meeting under chapter 610. Discrepancies in such report shall be resolved within
126 thirty days of the review and the board, in conjunction with the school administration,
127 shall attempt to address and resolve substantiated concerns relating to incidents listed
128 on such report, as concerns are expressed during such monthly review by school
129 administration or school board or governing board members.
130 8. (1) A school district or charter school employee or volunteer may, in the
131 course of fulfilling duties or performing services for such school district or charter
132 school, intervene in an incident involving an act of bullying, act of school violence or
133 violent behavior, or crime committed against a pupil to protect such pupil.
134 (2) Such school district or charter school employee or volunteer shall be held
135 harmless and immune from any liability for actions described in subdivision (1) of this
136 subsection if:
137 (a) In the course of intervening in such incident, such employee or volunteer
138 follows a proper procedure for such interventions adopted by the school board of such
139 school district or the charter school's governing board; or
140 (b) Such employee or volunteer intervenes in good faith and in a manner that
141 such employee or volunteer reasonably believes is afforded the defense of justification
142 under chapter 563.
143 9. (1) A school district or charter school, or an employee of such district or
144 charter school, that in good faith imposes disciplinary action under this section upon a
145 bullying student shall not be civilly liable for such disciplinary action.
146 (2) If a school district or charter school, or an employee of such district or
147 charter school, prevails in an action brought against such school district, charter school,
148 or employee described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the court shall award court
149 costs and attorney's fees to such prevailing school district, charter school, or employee.
150 10. (1) This section shall not be construed to provide immunity from liability for
151 a school district's or charter school's denial, or the denial by an employee of such
152 district or charter school, of any constitutionally protected right of a student.
153 (2) Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be construed to limit any
154 immunities or defenses available under state or federal law to a school district, a charter
155 school, or employees or volunteers of such school district or charter school.
156 11. (1) For the purposes of reporting requirements under section 210.115,
157 incidents of bullying, acts of school violence or violent behavior, or crime may be
158 considered abuse.
159 (2) If two or more employees or volunteers who are required to report jointly
160 have knowledge of a known or suspected instance of child abuse, a single report may be

HB 1698 6
161 made by the school district's or charter school's designated member. Any individual
162 who has knowledge that the individual designated to report has failed to do so shall
163 thereafter immediately make the report. No provision of this section shall be construed
164 to preclude any person from reporting such abuse and such person shall be afforded the
165 same protections provided under sections 210.135 and 210.145 for reports of abuse in
166 compliance with section 210.115.
167 12. No charter school shall expel or transfer a student to a school district solely
168 due to reports of bullying made against such student.
✔